Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3010
Job training reimbursements; interest
not allowed.

Interest
shall not be allowable on any job training reimbursements earned under the
Teleworker Job Creation Act.

Laws 2010, LB1081, § 10.